Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4106.01
DNA samples; collection method choice.

A person required to submit a DNA sample pursuant to section 29-4106 shall be given the choice of having the sample collected by a blood draw or a buccal cell collection kit. Any person who collects a DNA sample pursuant to section 29-4106 shall honor the choice of collection method made by the person providing the DNA sample. If the person required to submit the DNA sample does not indicate a preference as to the method of collection, either method may be used to collect the sample.

Laws 2006, LB 1113, § 31.